Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-1234
Class 3 and 4 motorboats; lights required; enumerated.

Under the conditions described in section 37-1232, every vessel of Classes 3 and 4 propelled by machinery shall carry the following lights:

(1) A lantern or flashlight;

(2) A white light placed over the fore and the aft centerline of the vessel showing an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of two hundred twenty-five degrees and so fixed as to show the light from right ahead to twenty-two and five-tenths degrees abaft the beam on either side of the vessel;

(3) A white light aft to show all around the horizon and higher than the white light forward; and

(4) On the starboard side a green light so constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon one hundred twelve and five-tenths degrees, so fixed as to throw the light from right ahead to twenty-two and five-tenths degrees abaft the beam on the starboard side. On the port side a red light so constructed as to show an unbroken light over an arc of the horizon of one hundred twelve and five-tenths degrees, so fixed as to throw the light from right ahead to twenty-two and five-tenths degrees abaft the beam on the port side. Such side lights shall be fitted with inboard screen of sufficient height so set as to prevent these lights from being seen across the bow.

Laws 1978, LB 21, § 34;

Laws 1989, LB 169, § 2.